Idaho, session 2026, H0665.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-420D, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-420D. APPALOOSA LICENSE PLATES. (1) On and after January 1, 2003,
any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under pursuant to the pro-
visions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under pursuant to any
other provision of law for which the purchase of a special license plate is
allowed, may apply for and, upon department approval, receive special Ap-
paloosa license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of
this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross
weight over sixteen thousand (16,000) twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds.
Availability of Appaloosa license plates for other vehicles shall be subject
to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.
(2) In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4,
title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five
dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars
($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00)
of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be de-
posited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of
administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars
($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal
fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer for deposit to the Appaloosa
horse club, museum and heritage center foundation and shall be used exclu-
sively for the purpose of funding youth horse programs within the state of
Idaho education and programming related to horses in the state of Idaho.
(3) Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under pursuant
to the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may
transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required
transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle only
upon receipt of the new registration from the department.
(4) The Appaloosa license plate shall be of a color and design in ac-
cordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. That portion
of the design which that features an Appaloosa shall be acceptable to the Ap-
paloosa horse club, museum and heritage center foundation and shall be ap-
proved by the department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the
department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate de-
sign, shall be paid by the Appaloosa horse club.


(5) Sample Appaloosa license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty
dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the
state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be trans-
ferred to the Appaloosa horse club museum and heritage center foundation. No
additional fee shall be charged for personalizing sample plates.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.